Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5464XS (1) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2076 Section 1. Section 256.183, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. Adopts a policy that requires the 3 institution to waive tuition and mandatory fees for a student 4 for the semester that the student is student teaching in the 5 state of Iowa. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256.183, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 08. âStudent teachingâ means the 9 supervised full-time clinical instructional experience in a 10 teacher preparation programâs final year in which the student 11 teacher assumes responsibility for planning, instruction, 12 and assessment in the classroom of a cooperating teacher 13 appropriately licensed in the subject area and grade level 14 endorsement being pursued. 15 Sec. 3. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Direct the institutions of higher 18 education under its control to adopt a policy that requires the 19 institution to waive tuition and mandatory fees for a student 20 for the semester that the student is student teaching in the 21 state of Iowa, as defined in section 256.183. 22